Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.200

Unlicensed farm labor contractors—Liability for services.

Any person who knowingly uses the services of an unlicensed farm labor contractor shall be personally, jointly, and severally liable with the person acting as a farm labor contractor to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in this chapter. In making determinations under this section, any user may rely upon either the license issued by the director to the farm labor contractor under RCW 19.30.030 or the director's representation that such contractor is licensed as required by this chapter.

[ 2000 c 171 s 48; 1985 c 280 s 14.]